Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.527.030

Proceeds from sale of bonds—Deposit—Use.

(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW 28A.527.010 shall be deposited in the school construction and skill centers building account created in RCW 28A.527.090.

(2) The proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes stated in RCW 28A.527.010 and for the payment of the expenses incurred in connection with the sale and issuance of the bonds.

[ 2008 c 179 s 204.]